Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the 2023-2025 biennium are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Chemeketa Community
College, Building 7 Remodel ........ $ 8,110,000
(b) Klamath Community College,
Childcare Resource Learning
Center ...............................................$ 1,535,000
(c) Rogue Community College,
Transportation Technology
[Center...............................................$ 7,105,000]
Centers ................................... $ 7,105,000
(d) Central Oregon Community
College, Renovation and
Expansion of CTE Facilities
at Redmond Campus ...................... $ 4,050,000
(e) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building ........... $ 8,010,000
(f) Oregon Coast Community
College, Center for Trades
Education .........................................$ 8,110,000
(g) Columbia Gorge Community
College, Campus Renovations
for Student Safety and
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 1
Success ............................................$ 5,595,000
(h) Lane Community College,
Science, Mathematics and
Engineering Building
Renovation .......................................$ 8,110,000
(i) Portland Community College,
Rock Creek Campus Building
Complex - Phase I .......................... $ 8,110,000
(j) Southwestern Oregon
Community College,
Student Uplift and
Collaboration Create Expanded
Support and Success ...................... $ 8,110,000
(k) Umpqua Community College,
Welcome Center and Medical
Careers Training Hub ................... $ 8,110,000
(L) University of Oregon,
Friendly Hall Renovation ............. $ 7,650,000
(m) Oregon State University,
Collaborative Innovation
Complex ............................................$ 72,680,000
(n) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design
Project Completions ....................... $ 4,330,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ......................... $ 10,333,333
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) ................ $ 100,885,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ................. $ 50,570,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ........................................$ 100,885,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Salem Owen Summers Building
Service Life Extension .................. $ 2,955,000
(B) Salem Owen Summers Building
Seismic Strengthening and
Life Safety Improvements ............. $ 5,595,000
(b) Department of State Police:
(A) Central Point Office
Expansion .........................................$ 26,845,000
(B) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office ........... $ 21,545,000
(C) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office .............................. $ 7,385,000
(c) Department of Corrections:
(A) Camera System ............................... $ 8,615,000
(B) Capital Improvement and
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 2
Renewal ............................................$ 50,570,000
(C) Wireless Communication
System...............................................$ 13,070,000
(d) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Camp Riverbend Dorm
[Renovation ......................................$ 5,455,000]
Renovation.............................. $ 9,005,000
(B) Capital Improvements -
All Facilities ....................................$ 11,795,000
(C) Control Room Renovations .......... $ 330,000
(D) JJIS IT System
Modernization ................................. $ 7,850,000
(E) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations .....................................$ 11,425,000
(F) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements .................................. $ 1,509,910
[(G) Tillamook Dorm Renovation ......... $ 8,420,000]
(G) Tillamook Dorm Renovation ... $ 12,070,000
(H) Tillamook Medical and
Dental Renovations................. $ 830,000
(I) Oak Creek Youth
Correctional Facility............... $ 4,050,000
(e) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the Deaf
Capital Improvements ................... $ 3,550,000
(f) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ................... $ 2,461,687
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II ............................................$ 1,134,135
[(C) Multi-Mission Aircraft ................... $ 7,444,980]
(C) Multi-Mission Aircraft ............ $ 4,720,020
[(D) Salem Airport Hangar ................... $ 1,248,480]
(D) Salem Airport Hangar ............ $ 791,520
(g) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ........... $ 2,540,000
(h) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
(LIFT)/Permanent Supportive
Housing Programs .......................... $ 604,280,000
(i) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ........... $ 100,885,000
(B) FAMIS System Replacement,
Phase II ............................................$ 5,095,000
(C) University of Oregon,
Friendly Hall Renovation ............. $ 65,840,000
(D) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 3
Project Completions ....................... $ 53,175,000
(E) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Geothermal
System Emergency
Renovation .......................................$ 18,160,000
(F) Southern Oregon University,
Central Hall Capital
Improvements (Phase II) ........ $ 6,100,000
(j) Oregon Health Authority:
(A) Junction City Single
Unit Remodel .................................. $ 5,095,000
(B) PLC System Replacement ............. $ 3,045,000
(k) Department of Revenue,
Electronic Valuation
Information System ........................ $ 14,265,000
(L) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance
and Safety Phase III ...................... $ 216,920,000
(m) Judicial Department:
[(A) Benton County Courthouse ........... $ 8,950,000]
(A) Benton County Courthouse .... $ 15,925,000
(B) Clackamas County
[Courthouse ......................................$ 30,365,000]
Courthouse ............................. $ 45,535,000
(C) Morrow County Courthouse ........ $ 12,745,000
(D) Curry County Courthouse ............ $ 10,760,000
(n) Oregon Department of
Emergency Management,
Resiliency Grant Fund
established under
ORS 401.552............................. $ 5,095,000
(7) Department of
Transportation (Art. XI,
section 7), Interstate 5
Bridge Replacement Project ........ $ 251,825,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(8) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) .......................... $ 109,023,670
(9) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University,
Smith Memorial Union .................. $ 8,315,000
(b) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design
[Project Completions ....................... $ 16,190,000]
Project Completions................ $ 18,205,000
(10) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ......................... $ 20,000,000
(11) Housing and Community
Services Department
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 4
(Art. XI-I(2)).....................................$ 50,000,000
(12) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ......... $ 4,050,000
(b) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ................... $ 2,418,313
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II ............................................$ 1,575,865
[(C) Multi-Mission Aircraft ................... $ 4,720,020]
(C) Multi-Mission Aircraft ............ $ 7,444,980
[(D) Salem Airport Hangar ................... $ 791,520]
(D) Salem Airport Hangar ............ $ 1,248,480
(c) Department of Justice,
Legal Tools Replacement
System 3.0 ........................................$ 21,520,000
(d) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
(A) Liquor Warehouse Conveyor
[System..............................................$ 15,185,000]
System .................................... $ 24,305,000
(B) Liquor Warehouse Land
[and Building .................................. $ 55,515,000]
and Building............................ $ 46,395,000
(C) Liquor Warehouse
Management IT System ................ $ 16,695,000
Total General Obligation
[Bonds ...............................................$2,351,436,913]
Bonds...................................... $2,398,871,913
SECTION 2.  Section 2, chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The amounts  authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of revenue bonds
of the state during the 2023-2025 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 500,000,000
Department of Transportation,
Highway User Tax ....................... $ 360,000,000
Department of Transportation,
Grant Anticipation Revenue
Vehicle ............................................$ 300,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department .................................... $ 30,000,000
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
[Lottery Revenue Bonds .............. $ 501,100,000]
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 528,330,000
Total Direct Revenue
[Bonds .............................................$ 1,691,100,000]
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 5
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,718,330,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds ..................... $ 600,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ..........................................$ 2,000,000
Oregon Facilities Authority ...... $ 1,000,000,000
Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 1,300,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
Bonds ..............................................$ 2,902,000,000
[Total Revenue Bonds ............................ $ 4,593,100,000]
Total Revenue Bonds .................... $ 4,620,330,000
SECTION 3.  Section 8, chapter 111, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) For the biennium ending June  30, 2023, at the request of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the McKenzie River Discovery Center,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585 in
an amount that  produces $3 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of
this section, plus an additional amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay
bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the  depart-
ment for deposit in the ODAS Economic Development Distributions  Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to the McKenzie River  Discovery Center to [ construct a central exhibition
structure] restore, renovate, remodel or rebuild several historic buildings to create exhibition
space and undertake site improvements at the site of the Historic Old Leaburg Fish Hatchery.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the  finding that the [ central exhibition
structure] new exhibition space  and site improvements  will enhance the economic viability of the
region through increased tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
SECTION 4.  Section 33, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 33.  (1) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the Department of  Transportation,
the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in
an amount that produces $20 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection  (2) of
this section, plus an additional amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay
bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued  under this section must be transferred to the Depart-
ment of Transportation for deposit in the DOT Economic  Development Distributions Fund estab-
lished under ORS 461.557, for distribution to the [ Port of Hood River ] Hood River-White Salmon
Bridge Authority  to support the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge replacement project.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish  and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that a safe, efficient and reliable
transportation infrastructure supports the long-term economic development and livability  of this
state.
SECTION 5.  Section 44, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 44.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon Business Development
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 6
Department, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $20 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State Treasurer to be neces-
sary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the Oregon
Business Development Department for deposit  in the Coos Bay Channel Fund established by section
15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws  2007, for distribution to the Oregon International Port of Coos Bay
to deepen  and widen the Coos Bay Federal Navigation Channel  and for the design, engineering,
permitting and land acquisition efforts related to the Pacific Coast Intermodal Port project .
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the finding that port facilities and related
infrastructure are an integral part of the  commercial and industrial infrastructure of this state, and
promote economic development.
SECTION 6.
 Section 45, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 45.  (1) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the Oregon Business Development
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $20 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an  additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be neces-
sary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery  bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the Oregon
Business Development Department for deposit  in the Coos Bay Channel Fund established by section
15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, for distribution to the Oregon International  Port of Coos Bay
to deepen and widen the Coos Bay Federal Navigation Channel  and for the design,  engineering,
permitting and land acquisition efforts related to the Pacific Coast Intermodal Port project .
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that port facilities and related
infrastructure are an integral part of the  commercial and industrial infrastructure of this state, and
promote economic development.
SECTION 7.
 Section 21, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 21.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon Business Development
Department, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces [ $5 million ] $9 million  in  net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the Oregon
Business Development Department for deposit in the OBDD  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established  under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to the City of
Aumsville to build a [ mechanical processing wastewater treatment plant ] wastewater treatment
plant and increase the capacity of several segments of the gravity collection sewer system .
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and  wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that wastewater treatment sys-
tems and related sewer infrastructure  are an integral part  of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this  state, and improving wastewater treatment will promote economic development
and watershed health.
SECTION 8. Sections 24 and 32, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, are repealed.
SECTION 9. (1) For the biennium ending June 30, 2025, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with Parrott Creek
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 7
Child and Family Services,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Parrott Creek Child and  Family Services for con-
struction of a youth residential treatment campus in Clackamas County.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
individuals increase their potential for self-sufficiency, increase their economic productivity
and use fewer public resources when they have access to treatment programs and services.
SECTION 10.
(1) For the biennium ending June 30, 2025, at the request  of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the Family
YMCA of Marion  and Polk Counties, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $3 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Family YMCA of Marion and Polk Counties to de-
velop a centralized social service and resource  center that includes affordable housing in
downtown Salem.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having housing  and social services for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s
healthy economic growth; and
(b) A severe shortage of affordable housing facilities and related social services exists  in
Oregon, and market indicators demonstrate a  growing gap between the supply of and the
demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 11. (1) For  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with Lane County, the
State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585
in an amount that produces $7.5 million in net proceeds for the purposes  described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State Treasurer to be
necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Lane County  for construction of the Fairgrounds
Multi-Use Facility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
constructing the multi-use facility will enhance the economic viability of the region through
increased tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
(4) Issuance of bonds and  distribution of net proceeds to Lane County is contingent upon
all other financing for the project being secured.
SECTION 12.
(1) For the biennium ending June 30, 2025, at the request  of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 8
Hillsboro, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $15 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to  the City of Hillsboro for construction of the Hillsboro
Hops Ballpark.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
constructing the ballpark will enhance the  economic viability of the region through increased
tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
(4) Issuance of bonds and distribution of net proceeds to the City of Hillsboro  is contin-
gent upon all other financing for the project being secured.
SECTION 13.
 Section 11, chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 11.  (1) A public university that is carrying out a qualified project shall require each con-
tractor in a contract with an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater to:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 15 percent of the work hours that workers  in apprenticeable
occupations perform under the contract, in a manner consistent with the  apprentices’ respective
apprenticeship training programs;
(b) Establish and execute a plan for  outreach, recruitment and retention of women, minority
individuals and veterans to perform work under the contract,  with the aspirational target of having
at least 15 percent of total work hours performed by individuals in one or more of those groups;
(c) Provide health insurance and retirement benefits to workers; and
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged by the contractor  to abide by the requirements set forth
in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if the  work to be performed under the subcontract
has an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater.
(2) On or before February 1  of each year, each public university that is carrying out a qualified
project shall report to  the Joint Committee on Ways and Means or Joint Interim Committee on
Ways and Means, as part of the report required under ORS 350.379, on:
(a) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by apprentices;
(b) The amount  of work performed on qualified projects by women, minority individuals and
veterans; and
(c) The types and costs of health insurance  and retirement benefits provided to workers by
contractors and subcontractors.
(3) The requirements of this section are in addition  to, and not in lieu of, the requirements im-
posed under ORS 350.379.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship  training program” means the total system of apprenticeship that a particular
local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010,  operates, including the local joint committee’s
registered standards and all other terms and conditions for qualifying,  recruiting, selecting, em-
ploying and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Qualified project” means the following capital construction projects:
(A) The University of Oregon Friendly Hall renovation referenced in section 1 (1)(L) [ of this 2023
Act], chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023 ;
(B) The Oregon State University Collaborative Innovation Complex referenced  in section 1
(1)(m) [of this 2023 Act ], chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023 ;
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 9
(C) The Portland State University Vernier Science Center and Gateway Art and  Design project
completions  referenced  in section 1 (1)(n) [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023 ;
[and]
(D) The  Oregon Institute of Technology geothermal system emergency renovation referenced in
section 1 (6)(i)(E) [ of this 2023 Act. ], chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023; and
(E) The Southern Oregon University Central Hall Capital  Improvements (Phase II) ref-
erenced in section 1 (6)(i)(F),  chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 1 of this
2024 Act.
(f) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(g) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 14.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 10